Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.120

Registration—Renewal—Refusal—Notice—Hearing.

(1) Each seller of travel shall renew its registration on or before July 1st of every year or as otherwise determined by the director.

(2) Renewal of a registration is subject to the same provisions covering disciplinary action as a registration originally issued.

(3) The director may refuse to renew a registration for any of the grounds set out under RCW 19.138.130 and 18.235.130, and where the past conduct of the applicant affords reasonable grounds for belief that the applicant will not carry out the applicant's duties in accordance with law and with integrity and honesty. The director shall promptly notify the applicant in writing by certified mail of its intent to refuse to renew the registration. The registrant may request a hearing on the refusal as provided in RCW 18.235.050. The director may permit the registrant to honor commitments already made to its customers, but no new commitments may be incurred, unless the director is satisfied that all new commitments are completely bonded or secured to ensure that the general public is protected from loss of money paid to the registrant.

[ 2002 c 86 s 277; 1999 c 238 s 4; 1994 c 237 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Severability—1999 c 238: See note following RCW 19.138.030.